Wisconsin, session 2025, SB206.
do enact as follows:SB206,11Section 1. 421.103 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB206,2,32421.103 (5) Chapters 421 to 427 do not apply to residential rental agreements 3governed under s. 710.15 or ch. 704.SB206,24Section 2. 704.44 (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB206,2,105704.44 Residential rental agreement that contains certain provisions 6is void. (intro.) Notwithstanding s. 704.02, a residential rental agreement is void 7and unenforceable if it and subject to s. 704.445, a tenant may elect to void a 8residential rental agreement, or sever a provision from a residential rental 9agreement, if a court of competent jurisdiction finds that the residential rental 10agreement does any of the following:SB206,311Section 3. 704.44 (1m) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB206,3,31704.44 (1m) (intro.) Allows Authorizes a landlord to do any of the following 2because a tenant has contacted an entity for law enforcement services, health 3services, or safety services:SB206,44Section 4. 704.44 (9) of the statutes is amended to read:SB206,3,85704.44 (9) Allows Authorizes the landlord to terminate the tenancy of a 6tenant based solely on the commission of a crime in or on the rental property if the 7tenant, or someone who lawfully resides with the tenant, is the victim, as defined in 8s. 950.02 (4), of that crime.SB206,59Section 5. 704.44 (10) of the statutes is amended to read:SB206,3,1210704.44 (10) Allows Authorizes the landlord to terminate the tenancy of a 11tenant for a crime committed in relation to the rental property and the rental 12agreement does not include the notice required under s. 704.14.SB206,613Section 6. 704.445 of the statutes is created to read:SB206,3,2014704.445 Remedies for voidable residential rental agreements. (1) If a 15tenant elects to void the tenant’s residential agreement under s. 704.44, the 16tenant’s tenancy shall become a periodic tenancy as defined under s. 704.01 (2), and 17the tenant shall be responsible for the payment of rent, utilities, parking, and other 18charges under terms and conditions identical to the terms and conditions as set 19forth in the original residential rental agreement, but not including a provision 20described under s. 704.44 (1m) to (10).SB206,3,2321(2) If a tenant elects to sever a provision from his or her residential rental 22agreement as provided under s. 704.44, the unsevered portion of the residential 23rental agreement shall be given full effect.SB206,4,324(3) A tenant’s election to void or sever a provision from his or her residential 1rental agreement as provided under s. 704.44 is effective upon the tenant giving 2notice of the election to the landlord in the same manner as specified in s. 704.21 3(2).SB206,4,114(4) A person suffering pecuniary loss directly caused by a residential rental 5agreement’s inclusion of a provision described under s. 704.44 (1m) to (10) may sue 6for damages therefor in any court of competent jurisdiction and shall recover twice 7the amount of such pecuniary loss, together with costs, including a reasonable 8attorney fee. Pecuniary loss under this subsection does not include rental payments 9the tenant made under his or her residential rental agreement that included a 10provision described under s. 704.44 (1m) to (10) or any rule promulgated under this 11chapter.SB206,4,1412(5) A person injured by a residential rental agreement’s inclusion of a 13provision described under s. 704.44 (1m) to (10) is limited to the remedies provided 14under this section.SB206,4,1515